<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89626-0031 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-26-89.f2.A1030</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="18">National Highway Traffic Safety Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">23 CFR Part 1313</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 89-02; Notice 1]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Incentive Grant Criteria for Drunk Driving Prevention Programs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>National Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA),Department of Transportation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) implementsa new program enacted by the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1988, which authorizestwo new categories of federal incentive grants to States that adopt andimplement comprehensive drunk driving prevention programs which providefor certain specified elements. This rulemaking action proposes the mannerin which States would certify that they are eligible for these incentivegrants, and the procedure by which NHTSA would award such grants. The agencyrequests comments on the proposed regulation discussed in this notice.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Comments must be received by July 26, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Written comments should refer to the docket number andthe number of this notice and be submitted (preferably in ten copies) to:Docket Section, National Highway Traffic Safety Administration, Room 5109,Nassif Building, 400 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20590. (Dockethours are from 8 a.m. to 4 p.m.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Mr. Lewis Buchanan, Office ofAlcohol and State Programs, NTS-21, National Highway Traffic Safety Administration,400 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20590, telephone (202) 366-2753;or Ms. Heidi L. Coleman, Office of Chief Counsel, National Highway TrafficSafety Administration, telephone (202) 366-1834.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>On November 18, 1988, the Anti-DrugAbuse Act of 1988, Pub. L. 100-690, was signed into law by the President.Section 9001 of the Act, et seq., entitled the Drunk Driving PreventionAct of 1988, amends the Highway Safety Act of 1966, 23 U.S.C. 401, et seq.,by adding section 410, which authorizes a new incentive grant program.This program establishes a two-tiered incentive grant program, under whichStates may qualify for basic and supplemental incentive grants for adoptingand implementing comprehensive drunk driving prevention programs whichare self-sustaining and provide for certain specified elements that willimprove the effectiveness of the State's enforcement of drunk driving laws.States may qualify for these grants in up to three fiscal years.The section 410 program is similar to the ``section 408'' alcohol incentivegrant program administered by NHTSA (23 U.S.C. 408), under which Statesmay qualify for grants by adopting and implementing effective programsto reduce drunk driving. The section 408 program was first enacted in 1982,under Pub. L. 97-364, as a two-tiered (basic and supplemental) grant program.In 1984, section 408 was amended, Pub. L. 98-363, to expand the scope ofthe 408 program to include programs to combat drugged driving as well asdrunk driving and to establish a third grant for which States may qualify(special grants) to encourage the States to enact tough minimum sentencingstandards. Section 203 of the Surface Transportation and Uniform RelocationAssistance Act of 1987, Pub. L. 100-17, amended section 408 again by extendingfrom three to five, the number of fiscal years in which a State may receivesection 408 incentive grants.This notice implements the 1988 statute which creates the new section 410incentive grant program. It also proposes the manner in which States wouldcertify that they are eligible for the grants, and the procedure by whichNHTSA would award such grants. Since the States and members of the highwaysafety community concerned with drunk driving issues are already familiarwith the agency's section 408 program, we will point out, in this notice,many of the similarities and differences between the two programs. It isour hope that this will help to clarify the issues at hand.<ITAG tagnum="84">Limitations on Grant Amounts</ITAG>Section 410 provides, in subsection (d) that an eligible State may receiveas a basic grant an amount that shall not exceed 30 percent of its FY 1989highway safety grant (section 402) apportionment. This is similar to the``basic'' grant for an eligible State under the section 408 program, whichis 30 percent of the State's FY 1983 section 402 apportionment. Section402 apportionments are made to the States as formula grants under the HighwaySafety Act of 1966, 23 U.S.C. 402, to aid the States in conducting highwaysafety programs. To qualify for a section 410 basic grant, a State mustprovide for both an expedited driver's license suspension or revocationsystem and a self-sustaining drunk driving prevention program. These criteriawill be explained in further detail below, under the heading, ``Basic GrantCriteria.''As under the section 408 program, under section 410 a State may be eligiblefor supplemental grants only if it meets the basic grant requirements,and also meets the requirements for the supplemental grant. However, unlikesection 408, which provides for a single supplemental grant (of up to 20percent of a State's FY 1983 section 402 apportionment) for meeting a numberof supplemental criteria, section 410 establishes four separate supplementalgrants. A State may become eligible for one or more of these supplementalgrants, once it meets the basic criteria and the requirements of the particularsupplemental grant program, subject only to the matching requirements,which will be explained further below.An eligible State may receive as a supplemental grant an amount that shallnot exceed 10 percent of its FY 1989 section 402 apportionment for eachof three programs: mandatory blood alcohol concentration testing programsfor drivers involved in fatal and serious crashes who are believed to havecommitted an alcohol-related traffic offense; an effective system for preventingoperators of motor vehicles under age 21 from obtaining alcoholic beverages;and a suspension of registration and return of license plate program forrepeat offenders and individuals convicted of driving while their driver'slicense is under suspension or revocation for an alcohol-related offense.In addition, an eligible State may receive as a supplemental grant an amountthat shall not exceed 25 percent of its FY 1989 section 402 apportionmentfor a program which makes it unlawful to possess an open container or toconsume an alcohol beverage in a motor vehicle. A State that meets thecriteria for a basic grant and all four supplemental grants could receivegrant funds in an amount of up to 85 percent of its FY 1989 section 402apportionment. The criteria for qualifying for these supplemental grantswill be explained in further detail below, under the heading ``SupplementalGrant Criteria.''Since the statute provides that these grant amounts ``shall not exceed''the percentages identified above, the agency has the discretion to awardgrants of amounts which are less than those specified in the Act. As willbe explained in further detail in the ``Basic Grant Criteria'' portionof this notice, the agency has proposed to award a 20 percent basic grantunder certain circumstances, rather than the full 30 percent. States wouldbe able to qualify for the full 30 percent basic grant under the proposalby meeting additional requirements that need not be met to qualify forthe 20 percent grant. Similarly, as will be explained in further detailin the ``Supplemental Grant Criteria'' portion of this notice, the agencyhas proposed to award a 10 percent grant to States for a program whichmakes it unlawful to possess an open container or to consume an alcoholicbeverage in a motor vehicle under certain circumstances, rather than thefull 25 percent. States would be able to qualify for the full 25 percentunder the proposal by submitting additional information not required toqualify for the 10 percent grant.The agency has otherwise proposed to award the full amount of each grantto States that meet the statutory criteria and demonstrate compliance inaccordance with the regulation. We would be interested in receiving commentson the agency's proposed approach to the basic and open container and consumptiongrants, and whether it is believed that this approach should be consideredfor the other supplemental grants under section 410.The statute provides, in section 410(c), that States, which may receivegrants for up to three fiscal years, must match the section 410 grant fundsthey receive. The Act requires that the Federal share shall not exceed75 percent of the cost of implementing and enforcing the drunk drivingprevention program adopted to qualify for these funds in the first fiscalyear the State receives funds, 50 percent in the second fiscal year and25 percent in the third. These percentages are identical to those whichapply to the first three fiscal years of section 408 incentive grant funds.The limitations on grant amounts described above are included in andSection;1313.4(b) of the proposed regulation. In addition, the amount that wouldbe awarded under each grant is identified in the portion of the proposedregulation that describes the criteria for receiving that grant. See paragraphs(a) and (b) of andSection; 1313.5 and paragraphs (a), (b), (c)(1), (c)(2)(i)and (d) of andSection; 1313.6.The agency proposes to accept, as we do for both the section 402 and section408 programs, a ``soft'' match in section 410's administration. By this,we mean that the State's share may be satisfied by the use of either allowablecosts incurred by the State or the value of in-kind contributions applicableto the period to which the matching requirement applies. A State couldnot, however, use any Federal funds, such as its section 402 or 408 funds,to satisfy the matching requirements. In addition, a State could use eachnon-Federal expenditure only once for matching purposes. In other words,State funds expended to support drunk driving enforcement activities, ifused to match section 402 Federal funds, could not be used also to matchsection 408 or 410 grant money.<ITAG tagnum="84">Certification and Award Procedures</ITAG>In an effort to simplify the administration of this program, the agencyproposes certification and award procedures for section 410 incentive grantsthat are essentially the same as those for section 408 incentive grants.These procedures have been used successfully by the States and the agency'sheadquarters and regional staff with only minor modifications since theywere first established by regulation in 1983.If adopted, the proposed regulation would require that the State submitan application to NHTSA, which demonstrates that it meets the requirementsof the grants being requested. The particular requirements of these grantsare defined in detail in andSection;andSection; 1313.5 and 1313.6 of the proposedregulation. The State would also be required to submit a certificationthat: (1) It has a drunk driving prevention program that meets the grantrequirements; (2) It will use the funds awarded only for the implementationand enforcement of drunk driving prevention programs; and (3) It will maintainits aggregate expenditures from all other sources for its drunk drivingprevention programs at or above the average level of such expendituresin fiscal years 1987 and 1988. These conditions are established in section410 (a) and (b) of the statute. In determining their prior levels of fundingfor the purpose of calculating aggregate expenditures in fiscal years 1987and 1988, States must include any non-section 410 money expended for drunkdriving prevention purposes, regardless of source. It must include, forexample, both Federal and matching funds expended under sections 402 and408 for drunk driving prevention purposes. This statutory requirement,which is included in both the section 408 and 410 incentive grant programs,reflects Congress' interest in having States expand their drunk drivingactivities without their becoming dependent on Federal funds to conductthese activities.The agency would then notify the State as to whether or not it qualifiesfor section 410 grant funds. If the State is informed by NHTSA that itis eligible for a grant, the State would be required to submit, within120 days, a drunk driving prevention plan, similar in form to its section408 alcohol safety plan. The plan would have to describe the programs theState is and will be implementing in order to be eligible for the grantand provide the necessary information, identified in andSection; 1313.5 andandSection; 1313.6 of the regulation, to demonstrate that the programs complywith the applicable criteria. The plan would also describe how the specificsupplemental criteria adopted by a State are related to the State's overalldrunk driving prevention program.The agency proposes to permit each State to submit its plan as a portionof the State's section 402 Highway Safety Plan, an option which is availableto the States for their section 408 Alcohol Safety Plans. In addition,under the proposed regulation, a State could choose to submit a Drunk DrivingPrevention Plan that covers the period of one, two or three years in whichit is potentially eligible for section 410 grants. In subsequent years,States would update the plan to demonstrate that they meet subsequent yearrequirements.Upon receipt and subsequent approval of the plan, the agency would awardthe grant to the State, and would authorize the State to incur costs subjectto available funds. Vouchers would be submitted directly to the appropriateNHTSA Regional Administrator and reimbursement would be made to Statesfor authorized expenditures. The funding guidelines applicable to the section402 Highway Safety Program and the section 408 Alcohol Incentive GrantProgram (NHTSA Order 462-13A) would also be used to determine reimbursableexpenditures under the section 410 program. As with requests for reimbursementunder the section 402 and 408 programs, States should indicate on the voucherswhat percentage of the funds expended are eligible for reimbursement undersection 410.NHTSA is proposing to make awards in the order in which complete, qualifyingapplications are submitted. If the balance of available funds in any givenfiscal year is insufficient to make a complete award to a State, NHTSAproposes that the entire balance of remaining funds may be awarded. (Theagency notes that funding for the section 410 program is dependent uponannual appropriations, unlike the section 408 program which has ``contractauthority'' under the Highway Trust Fund.) He would permit the State whichwould receive an incomplete award to choose to wait until the next fiscalyear to receive its funds. States may select this option to avoid potentialpenalties that may result by receiving a partial grant since States mayreceive a grant in only three fiscal years. Time of submission would bedetermined by postmark for certifications delivered through the mail andby stamped receipt for certifications delivered in person.<ITAG tagnum="84">Basic Grant Criteria</ITAG>To be eligible for a basic grant, the Act specifies, in section 410(e)that a State must provide for an expedited driver's license suspensionor revocation system and a self-sustaining drunk driving prevention program.These are statutory requirements which the agency has no discretion tochange. As stated above, an eligible State may receive, under the statute,up to 30 percent of its fiscal year 1989 section 402 apportionment. Theagency proposes that States which qualify for a basic grant and providefor an administrative review and suspend the driver's license of offenderswithin 15 days of their receiving notice, under andSection; 410(e)(1) (C)and (F)(i) of the statute, would be awarded the full 30 percent. Statesthat qualify for a basic grant and provide for an administrative reviewand suspend the driver's license of offenders within 30, but not 15, daysof their receiving notice, under section 410(e)(1) (C) and (F)(ii) of thestatute, would be awarded 20 percent. These States must also show thatmeeting the 15-day requirement would impose a hardship upon the State.The elements of these two basic grant criteria and the manner in whichStates must demonstrate compliance are explained fully below:1. <T3>Expedited Driver's License Suspension or Revocation System</T3>. Section410(e) specifies that eligible States must provide:<ITAG tagnum="21">(1) for an expedited driver's license suspension or revocation systemfor individuals who operate motor vehicles while under the influence ofalcohol which requires that_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) when a law enforcement officer has probable cause under Statelaw to believe an individual has committed an alcohol related traffic offenseand such individual is determined, on the basis of a chemical test, tohave been under the influence of alcohol while operating the motor vehicleor refuses to submit to such a test as proposed by the officer, the officerserve such individual with a written notice of suspension or revocationof the driver's license of such individual and take possession of suchdriver's license;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) the notice of suspension or revocation referred to in subparagraph(A) provide information on the administrative procedures under which theState may suspend or revoke in accordance with the objectives of this sectiona driver's license of an individual for operating a motor vehicle whileunder the influence of alcohol and specify any rights of the operator undersuch procedures;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) the State provide, in the administrative procedures referred toin subparagraph (B), for due process of law, including the right to anadministrative review of a driver's license suspension or revocation withinthe time period specified in subparagraph (F);</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(D) after serving notice and taking possession of a driver's licensein accordance with subparagraph (A), the law enforcement officer immediatelyreport to the State entity responsible for administering drivers' licensesall information relevant to the action taken in accordance with this paragraph;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(E) in the case of an individual who, in any 5-year period beginningafter the date of the enactment of this section, is determined on the basisof a chemical test to have been operating a motor vehicle under the influenceof alcohol or is determined to have refused to submit to such a test asproposed by the law enforcement officer, the State entity responsible foradministering driver's licenses, upon receipt of the report of the lawenforcement officer_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) suspend the driver's license of such individual for a period ofnot less than 90 days if such individual is a first offender in such 5-yearperiod; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) suspend the driver's license of such individual for a periodof not less than 1 year, or revoke such license, if such individual isa repeat offender in such 5-year period; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(F) the suspension and revocation referred to under subparagraph (D)take effect not later than_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) 15 days after the day on which the individual first received noticeof the suspension or revocation in accordance with subparagraph (B); or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) 30 days after the day on which the individual first receivednotice of the suspension or revocation in accordance with subparagraph(B) if the Secretary determines that the requirements of clause (i) wouldimpose a hardship upon the State.</ITAG>In summary, the statute requires, under this criterion, that eligible statesprovide for an administrative driver's license suspension or revocationsystem that contains the following elements: (1) law enforcement officerstake possession of an individual's driver's license on the spot if thedriver fails a chemical test or refuses to take one; (2) officers serveoffenders with notice of the suspension or revocation and of their rights,including the right to an administrative review; (3) the officers immediatelyforward a report to the appropriate licensing agency within the State;(4) due process is ensured by providing offenders with the right to anadministrative review; (5) the period of suspension or revocation is notless than 90 days for first offenders and not less than 1 year for repeatoffenders; and (6) the administrative review takes place and the suspensionor revocation, if any, takes effect not later than 15 days after the individualreceives notice (30 days if the State can show that meeting the 15-dayrequirement would impose a hardship on the State).Some of Congress' reasons for passing this provision of the Act are explainedin the Act's legislative history. Senator Lautenberg, sponsor of S. 2367,the original Senate version of Section 410, which was referred to the Committeeon Environment and Public Works, stated that an administrative suspensionor revocation procedure, ``under which a drunk driver's license is takenaway, and taken quickly * * * is a proven means of reducing drunk driving.* * * Administrative revocation gets the drunk driver off the road. Thepunishment is both sure and swift. That certainty of punishment is essentialin combatting drunk driving.'' Cong. Rec. Daily Ed., S. 16012, October4, 1988.In addition, Senate Report 100-594, which was prepared by the Committeeon Commerce, Science, and Transportation of S. 2549, a bill also sponsoredby Senator Lautenberg, with expedited suspension provisions identical toS. 2367, states:<ITAG tagnum="21">The administrative suspension law required for the basic grant hasbeen demonstrated to be [one of the] most effective measures for reducingthe incidence of drunk driving fatalities. The Insurance Institute forHighway Safety recently completed a study on this point, ``Fatal CrashInvolvement and Law Against Alcohol-Impaired Driving.'' The study foundadministrative suspension laws currently in force to be the most effectiveof all the laws studied in reducing alcohol-related driving fatalities,and found a 9 percent reduction in alcohol-related fatalities attributableto such laws.</ITAG>NHTSA agrees that administrative license suspension systems are effectivecountermeasures to drunk drivers, because they assure prompt, mandatorylicense sanctions against all offenders. The agency has strongly endorsedthe concept of administrative license suspensions and the enactment ofthese administrative license suspension laws. NHTSA also believes, however,that States should have the flexibility to develop the details of an administrativelicense suspension law to meet their individual needs, so the agency didnot support the establishment of an inflexible Federal model for all Statesto follow.However, Congress opted against flexibility. As is evident from a reviewof the legislation, Congress did not simply require that States providefor an administrative suspension or revocation law, but rather selectedthe particular model that States must use to qualify for section 410 funds.Unfortunately, the agency has no legal authority to modify or waive anyof the statutory requirements. While 23 States and the District of Columbiacurrently have administrative suspension laws on the books, which appearto work quite effectively, it is our belief that few if any of these Statescurrently meet the strict detailed standards established in the section410 legislation. NHTSA proposes, in this notice, to provide some limiteddegree of flexibility, to the extent permitted by the satute, through themanner by which States may demonstrate compliance with this statutory criterion.This notice highlights below the most salient features of the applicableportions of the proposed regulation.The terms ``operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol''and ``under the influence of alcohol while operating the motor vehicle''are used in paragraphs (A) and (B) of section 410(e)(1), and elsewherein the legislation. The agency proposes to define these terms so that theyapply to persons determined, by use of a chemical test, to have an alcoholconcentration in the blood or breath of 0.10 percent or greater. Consistentwith the definitions in the 408 incentive grant program, these terms wouldnot include persons who refuse to submit to such a test. To ensure thatall offenders that may be subject to suspension or revocation under a State'slaw are provided with the same level of due process protection, we proposeto specify, in andSection; 1313.5(a)(1)(i)(B), that refusers as well as otheroffenders are entitled to receive notice of their rights, including theright to an administrative review.The statute requires that law enforcement officers serve offenders withnotice of their rights, including the right to an administrative review.In addition, it provides, in section 410(e)(1)(C), that States must providefor ``due process of law, including the right to an administrative review,''which takes place not later than 15 days after the individual receivesnotice (30 days if the State can show that meeting the 15-day requirementwould impose a hardship on the State.)Accordingly, as long as a State meets these requirements by providing offenderswith proper notice and the right to an individualized administrative reviewwhich takes place within the time established by statute, the agency wouldpresume that due process has been ensured. We request commens on whetherit is believed that further guidance on the procedures necessary to ensuredue process is required.In an effort to simplify the regulatory language, we propse to avoid repeatingthe phrase ``any 5-year period beginning after the date of the enactmentof this section,'' or related phrases, in a number of places in the regulationthat refer to the statutory criterion. Instead, this phrase would be includedin the proposed definition of the term ``repeat offender'' and appropriatelanguage would replace related phrases in andSection; 1313.5 of the proposedregulation. Most importantly, the agency interprets this language in theAct to mean that an offender is an individual who has failed a chemicaltest or refused to submit to one after November 18, 1988. These individualsare considered to be repeat offenders if they have failed a chemical testor refused to submit to one on two or more occasions within a 5-year period,and if at least two of these incidents occurred after November 18, 1988.The length of time for which suspensions must be served (or which mustpass before an offender whose driving privileges are revoked may obtaina new license) is defined in paragraph (E) of section 410(e)(1). Like section408 of the Highway Safety Act, section 410 provides that this period mustbe not less than 90 days for first offenders and not less than one yearfor repeat offenders. The Senate reports prepared by the Environment andPublic Works and the Commerce, Science and Transportation Committees bothstate that the Secretary is expected, in promulgating implementing regulations,to provide for periods of ``hard'' suspension, during which time an offenderis not allowed conditional driving privileges. The agency's regulationimplementing the section 408 program provides, in 23 CFR 1309.3(f), thatfirst offenders (other than refusers) must receive a ``hard'' suspensionfor the first thirty days of their 90 day suspension period, and that repeatoffenders (including repeat refusers) and first refusers must receive a``hard'' suspension for the full one year or 90 days, respectively. Theagency proposes to adopt this definition in 23 CFR 1313.3(i), so that thesame periods apply to driver license suspensions and revocations in thesection 410 program. For more information on the application of the section408 definition, particularly with regard to the conditions under whichrestricted licenses or In-Vehicle Alcohol Testing Devices (IVAT's) maybe used, see 53 FR 32375, 32377 (August 25, 1988).Both the legislation and the proposed rule refer to ``suspensions'' and``revocations.'' Although these actions do differ, the two terms are definedin the same manner in the proposed regulation. If the driver's licenseof an offender is revoked, that individual must apply for a new driver'slicense to regain driving privileges. This step is not necessary if thedriver's license of the offender is suspended, although some action mayneed to be taken, such as the payment of reinstatement fees. For the purposeof this criterion, the agency is concerned only that, under suspensionsor revocations, offenders lose their driving privileges for the requisiteperiods of time. The section 410 statute does not, and the agency doesnot propose to, specify what actions offenders must take to regain drivingprivileges after these periods of time have passed, although NHTSA doesnot recommend that license reinstatement should occur automatically. Withrespect to driver's licenses, the term ``suspension'' as used in this noticeshould be read to pertain to both suspensions and revocations, whereverappropriate.The time frames within which an administrative review must take place andthe suspension, if any, must take effect are defined in paragraphs (C)and (F) of section 410(e)(1). These occurrences must take place within15 days after the individual first received notice of the suspension andthe right to have an administrative review, or within 30 days after theindividual first received notice if the agency has determined that the15-day requirement would impose a hardship upon the State. Individualswill generally receive notice, and lose possession of their driver's licenseat the time of arrest. Although individuals would lose possession of theirdriver's license at that time, they generally would not immediately losetheir driving privileges since they may be issued a temporary license.The agency believes individuals would receive notice and lose possessionof their license at a later time only when an individual's chemical testresults are not immediately available, such as when the State uses a laboratoryto determine the results of chemical tests using blood or urine samples.Even in these circumstances, chemical test results would be obtained and,therefore, individuals would receive notice and lose possession of theirlicense, within a matter of days after arrest.The agency believes that States which meet all the basic criteria, butmeet the 30 rather than the 15-day requirement, should be considered qualifiedfor a section 410 basic grant. However, we wish to recognize, and provideincentives for States that go further, and provide administrative reviewsand suspend driver's licenses within 15 days after offenders receive theirnotice. For this reason, we propose to award 20 percent basic grants toqualifying States that meet the 30-day but not the 15-day requirement,and 30 percent grants to qualifying States that provide administrativereviews and suspend driver's licenses within the 15-day period. The informationthat must be provided by States qualifying for a 20 percent basic grant,to establish hardship under the 30-day expedited suspension requirement,is discussed further below.In a final rule dated August 25, 1988 (53 FR 32375), NHTSA created moreflexibility in the section 408 program by providing the States with alternativemethods for demonstrating compliance with the statutory criteria for thatprogram. The agency proposes to offer similar flexibility from the startin the section 410 program, to the maximum extent practicable, while stillensuring compliance with the statutory criteria.Whether the State is applying for a 20 or 30 percent basic grant, the agencybelieves that the first four elements of the expedited driver's licensesuspension requirement (andSection; 1313.5(a)(1)(i) (A)-(D) of the proposedregulation) must, necessarily, be demonstrated by submission of the State'slaw, regulation or binding policy directive. Under our proposal, we wouldnot require data from any State, in either the first or in subsequent years,to demonstrate compliance with these elements of the criterion. With regardto the remaining two elements (andSection; 1313.5(a)(1)(i) (E) and (F) ofthe proposed rule), which cover the length of the suspension and the timewithin which the administrative review must take place and the suspensionmust take effect, the agency proposes to allow States to qualify for 20or 30 percent grants, as either ``Law'' or ``Data'' States, as they arepermitted to do in demonstrating compliance with the ``prompt suspension''criterion for the section 408 program (see 23 CFR 1309.5(a) (2) andamp; (3),as amended).The agency would consider a State to be a ``Law'' State in either case,for purposes of this criterion, if the terms of the State's laws, regulations,or binding policy directives, on their face, meet each element of the expeditedsuspension requirement. States would be considered to be ``Data'' Statesif the terms of the State's laws, regulations, or binding policy directives,on their face, meet each element of the expedited suspension requirement,with the exception of the elements described in andSection; 1313.5(a)(1)(i)(E) and (F) of the proposed regulation, regarding the length of the suspensionand the time within which the administrative review must take place andthe suspension must take effect.To demonstrate compliance in the first year it receives a 30 percent basicgrant, a ``Law'' State would be required to submit only the law, regulationor binding policy directive itself governing its 15-day expedited suspensionsystem requirement; the State would not be required to submit any datain that year. To comply with this criterion in subsequent years, the Statewould be required to submit data on the actual license suspension terms,although the agency would accept data showing that the State meets an averageof these terms, or a plan to achieve these averages. In addition, the Statemust submit data demonstrating that the average time from notice to anyadministrative review and suspension does not exceed 15 days.As with the section 408 implementing regulation (23 CFR 1309.5(a)(2)(ii)),data showing the average license suspension terms must include only theperiod of time actually ordered by the State. For example, the data mustnot reflect the period of time during which an individual is eligible toreapply for a driver's license, but simply fails to do so. In addition,the data must include license suspension terms only to the extent thatthey are actually completed. The State would be permitted to submit databased on a representative sample. By representative sample, the agencymeans that data should be obtained from all communities in the State orfrom a sample of communities representative of the State as a whole.To demonstrate compliance for a 30 percent basic grant in both the firstand in subsequent years, a ``Data'' State would be required to submit itslaw, regulation, or binding policy directive governing its 15-day expeditedsuspension system. It must also submit data on the actual license suspensionterms, although the agency would accept data showing that the State meetsan average of these terms. A Data State would not have the option of submittinga plan showing how it intends to achieve these averages. In addition, theState must submit data demonstrating that the average time from noticeto any administrative review and suspension does not exceed 15 days. Datashowing the average license suspension terms must include only the periodof time actually ordered by the State, and must include license suspensionterms only to the extent they are actually completed. The State would bepermitted to submit data based on a representative sample.Consistent with the section 408 program, since the agency is providingincreased flexibility by permitting States to show compliance through averages,we will be able to accept absolutely no deviations from the license suspensionterms specified in the statute and the regulation from States that qualifybased on data. For example, to demonstrate compliance with the 90-day licensesuspension term for first offenders (including both failures and refusers),a Data State that submits data which shows an 89-day average would notbe eligible for funding.States that would not qualify for a 30 percent basic grant, but wish toapply for a 20 percent basic grant, may also do so as Law or Data States.To demonstrate compliance in the first year it receives a 20 percent basicgrant, a ``Law'' State would be required to submit only the law, regulationor binding policy directive itself governing its 30-day expedited suspensionsystem; the State would not be required to submit any data in that year.The State's law must provide that any administrative reviews are providedand driver's licenses are suspended within 30 days after the individualreceives notice of his or her right to a review and of the suspension,and the State must explain the hardship that would be imposed by a 15-dayadministrative review and suspension requirement. To comply with this criterionin subsequent years, the State would be required to submit data on theactual license suspension terms, although the agency would accept datashowing that the State meets an average of the license suspension terms,or a plan to achieve these averages. In addition, the State must submitdata demonstrating that the average time from notice to any administrativereview and suspension does not exceed 30 days, and explain the hardshipthat would be imposed by instituting 15-day administrative reviews andsuspensions. If a State seeks to qualify for a first year grant based upona demonstration of hardship, it would be required to demonstrate hardshipand submit a plan showing how it intends to meet the 15-day requirement.The State plan must demonstrate that it is striving to remove the remainingimpediments and achieve a license suspension system that satisfies the15-day requirement. In subsequent years, a State would be required to submitevidence showing that it has achieved considerable progress toward implementingthat plan.The agency believes that it is the intent of Congress that a State satisfythe 15-day period and that only in very unusual situations, unique to aparticular State, would a State be able to demonstrate a hardship_thatdespite its best efforts, it cannot achieve the 15-day period. We wouldnot consider, in determining whether a hardship would be imposed, potentialbenefits that would not be realized due to the lack of section 410 funding.To demonstrate that a hardship would be imposed, the State must show thatunreasonable administrative, financial, legal or other burdens would resultif it were to institute a procedure by which administrative reviews wouldtake place and suspensions would take effect within 15 days. In most instances,the agency believes that hardship claims require more than a showing thatcurrent State law or administrative requirements preclude implementationof the 15-day period. The agency proposes to consider hardship claims,for example, in the event that extraordinary increases in personnel orAutomated Data Processing costs would be needed for the State to meet the15-day requirement. The agency requests that commenters suggest other costsor burdens they believe represent the kinds of unreasonable burdens thatthe agency should consider to be a hardship.As stated earlier with regard to demonstrating compliance for a 30 percentgrant, data showing the average license suspension terms must include onlythe period of time actually ordered by the State, and must include licensesuspension terms only to the extent they are actually completed. The Statewould be permitted to submit data based on a representative sample. Byrepresentative sample, the agency means that data should be obtained fromall communities in the State or from a sample of communities representativeof the State as a whole. This is again parallel to the section 408 regulation(23 CFR 1309.5(a)(2)(ii)).To demonstrate compliance for a 20 percent basic grant in both the firstor in subsequent years, a ``Data'' State would be required to submit itslaw, regulation, or binding policy directive governing its 30-day expeditedsuspension system. It must also submit data on the actual license suspensionterms, although the agency would accept data showing that the State meetsan average of the license suspension terms. A Data State would not havethe option of submitting a plan showing how it intends to achieve theseaverages. In addition, the State must submit data demonstrating that theaverage time from notice to any administrative review and suspension doesnot exceed 30 days, and explain the hardship that would be imposed by instituting15-day administrative reviews and suspensions. Data showing the averagelicense suspension terms must include only the period of time actuallyordered by the State, and must include license suspension terms only tothe extent they are actually completed. The State would be permitted tosubmit data based on a representative sample.As noted above with respect to the 30 percent grant, since the agency isproviding increased flexibility by permitting States to show compliancethrough averages, we will be able to accept absolutely no deviations fromthe license suspension terms specified in the statute and the regulationfrom States that qualify based on data.The speed within which driver license suspensions take effect will determinewhether a State is eligible for a 20 or a 30 percent basic grant. Statesmust, in either case, have a self-sustaining drunk driving prevention program,and demonstrate compliance in the manner described below.2. <T3>Self-sustaining drunk driving prevention program.</T3> Section 410(e)specifies that eligible States must provide also:<ITAG tagnum="21">(2) for a self-sustaining drunk driving prevention program under whichthe fines or surcharges collected from individuals convicted of operatinga motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol are returned, or anequivalent amount of non-Federal funds are provided, to those communitieswhich have comprehensive programs for the prevention of such operationsof motor vehicles.</ITAG>The agency believes the three most essential elements of this program are:(1) the State, through its communities, institutes a ``comprehensive''drunk driving prevention program; (2) while the program may not be completely``self-sustaining,'' a significant portion of its costs is supported withnon-Federal funds; and (3) all of the fines or surcharges generated bydrunk driving prevention programs, or an equivalent amount, are used forthe program's continued operation.The agency recognizes that different States have different needs. As SenatorGore stated in the floor debate on this issue, ``smaller States may notbe able to develop programs of the size and scope of larger States.'' 134Congressional Record S17309 (Oct. 21, 1988). The agency believes that amodel comprehensive program should contain a broad range of drunk drivingprevention activities and approaches. While we encourage the States tocontinually strive for increased comprehensiveness, for the purpose ofthis criterion, NHTSA proposes to define the term ``comprehensive drunkdriving prevention program'' to include only those features and componentswhich we consider absolutely essential. These components and features arereflected in the proposed definition of the term ``comprehensive drunkdriving prevention program'' in andSection; 1313.3(b).We believe most of these components and features need no explanation. Regardingthe second component, on DWI prosecution, adjudication and sanctioning,NHTSA estimates that approximately 1.5% to 2% of licensed drivers couldbe arrested annually in a high arrest area. Those States that have notexperienced increased levels of DWI arrests may wish to use these figuresfor planning purposes.To demonstrate that they have ``comprehensive'' programs, we propose torequire that States describe their criteria and procedures for reviewingcommunity drunk driving prevention programs. The criteria that States useto evaluate whether these programs are comprehensive must meet or exceedthe agency's regulatory definition of the term cited above. In determininga State's eligibility for a basic grant, under this criterion, the agencydoes not propose to review individual community programs or require thatStates report the number of community programs that qualify. However, wewould hope that, in the future, an increased number of communities willqualify for revenues and that, with these revenues, community programswill become more comprehensive.Although the Act requires that eligible States must have ``self-sustaining''programs, it is clear that Congress did not expect that States would berequired to show that their costs were covered completely in order to qualify.Congress did expect that States must show, however, that all fines or surchargescollected from convicted drunk drivers, or an equivalent amount, be returnedor provided to the State's community level drunk driving prevention programs,that these non-Federal revenues are made available to continue the operationof community drunk driving prevention programs, and that a significantportion of the costs of operating these programs are supported with non-Federalfunds. To determine whether States are meeting these requirements, theagency is proposing to require that States describe their procedures forreturning or providing revenues to communities that have comprehensivedrunk driving prevention programs, submit data showing the aggregate amountof fines or surcharges actually collected and the aggregate amount of revenuesactually returned or provided to these programs, and certify that theserevenues are being used to continue the operation of comprehensive drunkdriving prevention programs and that a significant portion of the costsof these programs are supported with non-Federal funds.We recognize that it may take time before program improvements made inthe States actually result in increased revenues. We, therefore, proposeto leave the term ``significant'' undefined in our regulation, and permitthe States to establish their own definitions. We are also concerned that,if we were to establish a numerical measure for determining significance,the objective of creating self-sustaining programs could serve to underminethe more important goals of increasing the breadth and quality of comprehensivecommunity programs, and encouraging local initiative.NHTSA recognizes that many activities conducted by the State, such as enforcementefforts by the State highway patrol, directly benefit, and for the purposeof this criterion should be considered part of, a community's comprehensivedrunk driving prevention program. For this reason, we propose to accept,under the regulation, a self-sustaining program which returns or providesrevenues either directly to communities which have comprehensive drunkdriving prevention programs, or to activities conducted by the State forthe benefit of those communities. Section 1313.5(a)(2)(iii) of the proposedregulation, which is based on 23 CFR 1250.4(c) of NHTSA's section 402 implementingregulation, describes the conditions under which non-Federal funds expendedfor activities conducted by the State for the benefit of communities maybe considered to have been returned or provided to the community. We requestcomments on whether this alternative is appropriate, and on whether anyadditional requirements should be established to assure that communitiesreceive a sufficient amount of revenues.As noted above, the Act defines the mechanism for meeting the goals ofcomprehensiveness and self-sufficiency. It provides that all of the finesor surcharges generated by drunk driving prevention programs, or an equivalentamount, are used for the program's continued operation. More specifically,``fines or surcharges collected from individuals convicted of operatinga motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol are returned, or anequivalent amount of non-Federal funds are provided, to those communitieswhich have comprehensive programs for the prevention of such operationsof motor vehicles.''Congress used, as its model, a program that was established in New YorkState. See, S. Rept. 100-441. Under New York's program, all fines, penaltiesand forfeitures collected by a county from violations of the State's lawprohibiting persons from operating a motor vehicle while under the influenceof alcohol shall be paid to the State Comptroller, and then returned tothe county if its drunk driving program is approved. County programs areapproved by the State Motor Vehicle Commissioner based on a number of factors,including the interrelationship of the program with existing drunk drivingrelated programs in law enforcement, prosecution, adjudication, educationand other areas, and the avoidance of duplication of existing rehabilitationor other programs funded or operated by either the State or a municipality.Congress did not require, however, that States use this particular modelin order to qualify, and it is premature at this stage of the rulemakingprocess to determine whether New York has a qualifying program.NHTSA wishes to provide the States with sufficient flexibility to developtheir own models for self-sustaining programs, provided the goals describedabove and the statutory criterion are satisfied. To determine compliancewith this portion of the criterion, NHTSA believes it must review and,therefore, proposes that States submit, a copy of the law, regulation orbinding policy directive governing the State's self-sustaining drunk drivingprevention program, which requires that fines or surcharges must be imposed,and a description of the State's procedures for returning or providingrevenues to communities that have comprehensive drunk driving preventionprograms.Under the agency's proposed definition of the term ``fines or surchargescollected'' from individuals convicted of operating a motor vehicle whileunder the influence of alcohol, ``fines'' would include both fines andpenalties collected. ``Surcharges'' would include additional assessmentscollected over and above the fines and penalties, but it would not includeuser-type charges, such as rehabilitation, treatment, and license reinstatementfees. In addition, only fines or surcharges imposed on <T3>convicted</T3> individuals are covered by this provision. Based onthe statutory language in section 410(e)(2), the proposed regulation providesthat the revenues would not include fines or surcharges collected fromindividuals who lose their license administratively, but are not <T3>convicted</T3> of operating a motor vehicle while under the influenceof alcohol. NHTSA believes it may be appropriate for States to assess finesand surcharges when persons lose a driver's license administratively, butthe section 410 statute does not permit the agency to take those moneysinto account.NHTSA proposes to permit States to demonstrate compliance with this portionof the criterion by showing that <T3>either</T3> fines <T3>or</T3> surcharges are returned to qualifying communities. However,we request comments on whether, to ensure that a significant portion ofthe costs of operating comprehensive drunk driving prevention programsis funded with non-Federal moneys, NHTSA should require that both or thegreater of the two sources should be used for these purposes.Rather than returning the actual fines or surcharges to communities, underthis proposal, States would have the option of providing an equivalentamount from other non-Federal revenues through the State's ordinary appropriationsprocess. Congress established this option when it became aware that certainStates are constitutionally restricted as to their use of fine revenues(e.g., prohibited for any purpose other than education). Accordingly, Statesthat are unable or choose not to return the actual fines or surchargescollected from individuals convicted, can provide non-Federal funds fromothe sources (such as alcoholic beverage taxes or fees) to communitiesthat have comprehensive drunk driving prevention programs through the State'sordinary appropriations process. The agency requests comments on whetherthe States intend to use other mechanisms for providing funds to communities,and whether the method for demonstrating compliance with this element ofthe statutory criteria, described herein, would need to be altered forthese States.With regard to States that choose to provide an equivalent amount of non-Federalfunds to qualifying communities, NHTSA proposes to permit States to demonstratecompliance with this portion of the criterion by showing that an amountequivalent to <T3>either</T3> the State's fines <T3>or</T3> surcharges are provided to qualifying communities. However,as we did above, with regard to States that return the actual fines orsurcharges to these communities, we request comments on whether, to ensurethat a significant portion of the costs of operating comprehensive drunkdriving prevention programs is supported with non-Federal funds, NHTSAshould require that an amount equivalent to both or the greater of thetwo sources should be used for these purposes.We note that, in New York, the revenues collected within a county are returnedto that county once its drunk driving program is approved. The agency proposesthat, like New York's system, States with self-sustaining programs mustreturn or provide fines or surcharges collected within a community, oran equivalent amount, to that community once it qualifies with a comprehensiveprogram. The agency does not propose to mandate that States must returnor provide fines or surcharges collected within communities that do notqualify with such a program, or an equivalent amount. In addition, theagency has not proposed to define the term ``community'' in its regulation.While it may be effective to evaluate programs on a county basis in oneState, another State may need to evaluate community programs using a differentbasis. In fact, a State may wish to define communities in a manner thatis not uniform throughout the State, or to recognize communities whichcross State lines. The agency does not believe grant qualification shouldbe jeopardized on this basis. Accordingly, we believe it is best to leavethat decision to each individual State.Under the proposed regulation, States returning fines or surcharges collectedto qualifying communities must submit data showing the aggregate amountof fines or surcharges actually collected and returned. States providingan equivalent amount would have to show the aggregate amount of fines orsurcharges actually collected, the amount of other non-Federal funds actuallyprovided to communities and the source of those other funds. In addition,as stated previously, to qualify for a grant, States must certify thatthese revenues are being used to continue the operation of comprehensivedrunk driving programs and that a significant portion of the costs of operatingthese programs are supported with non-Federal funds.As stated earlier, although Congress used New York's program as a modelin enacting the self-sustaining program requirement of section 410, NHTSAwishes to provide the States with sufficient flexibility to develop theirown models for self-sustaining programs, provided the goals described aboveand the statutory criterion is satisfied. For example, New York has a centralizedsystem, under which fines, penalties and forfeitures are collected andpaid to the State Comptroller, and then returned to counties with approvedprograms. The agency does not wish to require that decentralized and mixedStates, which provide that communities retain the revenues collected, changetheir entire systems in order to qualify for this program if they otherwisemeet the criterion's requirements and Congressional goals. However, undersuch a system, where a community may retain revenues whether or not ithas a comprehensive drunk driving program and may not be required to accountfor its expenditures, additional requirements may need to be establishedto ensure qualification. Further, NHTSA is concerned that there may beless of an incentive in these States for communities to develop comprehensivedrunk driving prevention programs. We request comments on whether Statesystems that are decentralized or mixed should be accepted as self-sustainingunder this criterion, and suggestions regarding the additional information,if any, that States with these systems must submit to demonstrate compliance.<ITAG tagnum="84">Supplemental Grant Criteria </ITAG>In section 410(f), the Act provides for four separate supplemental grantprograms. States that are eligible for basic grants and also meet the supplementalcriteria, may receive one or more of these grants. These supplemental grantprograms include: (1) Mandatory blood alcohol concentration testing programsfor drivers involved in fatal and serious crashes who are believed to havecommitted an alcohol-related traffic offense; (2) an effective system forpreventing operators of motor vehicles under age 21 fromn obtaining alcoholicbeverage; (3) a program which makes it unlawful to possess an open containeror to consume an alcoholic beverage in a motor vehicle and (4) a suspensionof registration and return of license plate program for repeat offendersand individuals convicted of driving while their driver's license is undersuspension or revocation for an alcohol-related offense.Under the statute, a State that is eligible for the open container grantmay receive up to 25 percent of its FY 1989 section 402 highway safetygrant apportionment. A State that is eligible for the other supplementalgrant programs may receive up to 10 percent of its FY 1989 section 402apportionment for each grant.The elements of these supplemental grant criteria, and the manner in whichState must demonstrate compliance are explained fully below:1. <T3>Mandatory Blood Alcohol Concentration Testing Programs. </T3>Section410(f)(1) of the Act specifies that eligible must provide for:<ITAG tagnum="20">mandatory blood alcohol concentration testing whenever a law enforcementofficer has probable cause under State law to believe that a driver ofa motor vehicle involved in [a crash] resulting in the loss of human lifeor * * * serious bodily injury, has committed an alcohol-related trafficoffense.</ITAG>In other words, if a law enforcement officer has probable cause to believea driver of a motor vehicle involved in the fatal or serious injury crashhas committed an alcohol-related traffic offense, the State must providefor mandatory testing of that driver. The agency believes that this programwas meant to cover both fatally injured and surviving drivers.The Act requires that the Secretary determine what is meant by ``seriousbodily injury.'' The agency proposes to adopt, as its definition for thisterm, ``an injury, other than a fatal injury, which prevents injured personsfrom walking, driving or normally continuing the activities they were capableof performing before the injury occurred.'' This definition is essentiallythe same as the American National Standards Institute's definition of theterm, ``incapacitating injury,'' ANSI D16.1-1983, 2.3.3, which has beenadopted by NHTSA's Fatal Accident Reporting System and many States. Weare aware, from a preliminary review of State laws, that some States providefor BAC testing even when the crash does not result in serious bodily injuryor death. These States may provide for testing if any injury results. Thisbroader coverage would, of course, be acceptable under the proposed definition.Others, however, provide for BAC testing of drivers only when crashes resultin fatalities or injuries likely to case a fatality. These States wouldhave to expand the coverage of their laws to qualify under the agency'sproposed definition.The agency is also aware that the States that provide for post-crash BACtesting generally <T3>permit, </T3>but do not <T3>require, </T3>that tests be administered. If a State <T3>requires </T3>that testing be conducted, the agency proposes to permitthe State (which would be considered to be a ``Law'' State under this particulargrant) to demonstrate compliance in the first year it receives the grantby submitting only a copy of its law, regulation or binding policy directivegoverning the State's mandatory BAC testing program. The State would notbe required to submit data to demonstrate compliance in the first fiscalyear. Data would need to be submitted in subsequent years, however, showingthe number of drivers involved in fatal and serious bodily injury crashesand that, when there was probable cause to believe that the driver hadcommitted an alcohol-related traffic offense, substantially all of thesedrivers were tested for alcohol content and the results were reported tothe State. The State could provide the necessary data based on a representativesample.A State that does not require testing (a ``Data'' State under this particulargrant) would be required to demonstrate compliance in the first and insubsequent years by submitting a copy of its law, regulation or bindingpolicy directive governing the State's BAC testing program, plus data showingthe number of drivers involved in fatal and serious bodily injury crashesand that, when there was probable cause to believe that the driver hadcommitted an alcohol-related traffic offense, substantially all of thesedrivers were tested for alcohol concentration and the results were reportedto the State. The State could provide the necessary data based on a representativesample. While a data State's law would not need to make post-crash BACtesting mandatory, it would need to give law enforcement officers authorityto conduct this testing and establish all other elements of this criterion.The agency proposes to award the full 10 percent to States that qualifyunder the mandatory blood alcohol concentration testing program. 2. <T3>Program for Prevention of Operators under 21 from Obtaining AlcoholicBeverages.</T3> Section 410(f)(2) of the Act specifies that eligible Statesmust provide for:<ITAG tagnum="20">an effective system for preventing operators of motor vehicles underage 21 from obtaining alcoholic beverages * * *</ITAG>The terms ``alcoholic beverage'' and ``motor vehicle,'' which are usedto describe the qualifications for receiving this grant, are defined bystatute. The statutory definitions are reflected in andSection; 1313.3 ofthe proposed regulation. Congress provided, in the statute, that a State's effective system ``mayinclude the issuance of drivers' licenses to individuals under age 21 thatare easily distinguishable in appearance from drivers' licenses issuedto individuals 21 years of age and older.'' Easily distinguishable licensesmight, for example, use a different colored background, be stampted withthe word ``MINOR'' or include a profile photograph of under-21 drivers,as compared with a full-face photograph of individuals 21 years of ageand older. The agency believes the use of easily distinguishable licenses for underageddrivers is a necessary element for an effective program and, therefore,proposes to require that States use such licenses to qualify for this supplementalgrant. However, we do not believe that an easily distinguishable licensealone makes a State's program effective. An effective system must be comprehensiveand include a number of elements which, together, prevent operators under21 from obtaining alcoholic beverages. Under our proposal, in order to qualify for this supplemental grant, aState must issue easily distinguishable licenses to underaged drivers,and make it unlawful for a person who is less than 21 years of age to purchaseor publicly possess any alcoholic beverage or for a person to provide (bysale or otherwise) any alcoholic beverage to a person who is less than21 years of age. The State must also provide for meaningful penalties forboth the underaged person and the provider of the alcoholic beverage, andmaintain an effective and highly visible enforcement program. In addition,the State must have or put in place a Statewide training program for servers,vendors and its law enforcement community, and a public information programfor the general population addressing specifically the problem of underagedindividuals obtaining alcoholic beverages. In requiring that States prohibit public possession and both the purchaseand the provision (by sale or otherwise) of alcoholic beverages to minors,we recognize that the agency is proposing to go beyond what was mandatedunder the National Minimum Drinking Age Act (NMDA), 23 U.S.C. 158. TheNMDA covers only the purchase and public possession of alcoholic beveragesby minors and, under the implementing regulation (23 CFR Part 1208, see51 FR 10380, March 26, 1986), the Department has found that laws whichprohibit public possession and either the sale or purchase of alcoholicbeverages satisfy this requirement. (We would continue to recognize, aswe do under the NMDA, a limited number of exceptions, such as for religiouspurposes, and valid defenses for providers, such as lack of knowledge andgood faith.) The agency is also exceeding the requirements of the NationalMinimum Drinking Age Act by proposing to require meaningful penalities,as none were mandated under that Act. Based on the knowledge that has beengained in attempts to address illegal substance abuse, we believe effectiveprograms must be directed at providers as well as users of these substances.In addition, we doubt that any State can truly demonstrate that it hasan effective program if efforts are not directed at both supply and demand,or if the penalties imposed for violating the law are not meaningful. Moreover,we believe these additional requirements reflect the purpose of the section410 grant program, which was established as an incentive for States thatnot only prohibit minors from obtaining alcoholic beverages, but have ``aneffective system'' for doing so.The agency is considering and requests comments on whether to specify,in the regulation, the particular penalties that must be imposed. The currentresearch suggests that license-based penalties are effective as both aspecific and a general deterrent of drinking and driving, and the Stateof North Carolina has provided the agency with evidence of significantreductions in the involvement of underaged drivers in alcohol-related crashesfollowing implementing of laws that require loss of driving privilegesfor illegal purchase of alcohol and other offenses. Other penalties, however,may be equally effective. With regard to the underaged individual, our preliminary review of Statelaws reveals that a number of States provide that these individuals maytemporarily lose driving privileges for purchasing or publicly possessingalcoholic beverages. Under these laws, the loss of driving privileges occurswithout regard to the individual's alcohol concentration or the use ofa motor vehicle in the purchase or public possession of alcohol, and generallyoccurs after conviction rather than administratively. Those States whichprovide for a minimum license suspension term require that the suspensionlast for a period of not less than either thirty or sixty days. We requestcomments on whether either of these minimum driver license suspension termsor other penalties would be meaningful to individuals who are less than21 years of age and would contribute to an effective system for preventingunderage drinking. With regard to the provider of alcoholic beverages, our preliminary reviewof State laws reveals a variety of penalties ranging from liquor license-basedsanctions, fines or penalties which vary according to the type of provider(private individual, small or large establishment, employed server) andmay escalate with subsequent offenses, and imprisonment where providingalcoholic beverages to minors constitutes a criminal offense. The agencyrequests comments on whether these or other penalties (such as a pointsystem for licensed establishments under which points would be consideredby the licensing authority at the time of license renewal, or dram shopliability) would be meaningful to providers of alcoholic beverages andwould contribute to an effective system for preventing underage drinking.To demonstrate compliance in the first and in subsequent years, the Statewould be required to submit a law, regulation of binding policy directivewhich makes it unlawful for a person who is less than 21 years of age topurchase or publicly possess any alcoholic beverage or for a person toprovide (by sale or otherwise) any alcoholic beverage to a person who isless than 21 years of age, and which provides for meaningful penaltiesfor both the underaged individual and the provider of the alcoholic beverage.The State would also be required to submit sample driver's licenses issuedto persons both under and over 21 years of age. In addition, the Statewould have to submit data demonstrating that it maintains an effectiveand highly visible enforcement program, and has or plans to put in placea Statewide training program for servers, vendors and its law enforcementcommunity, and a public information program for the general populationaddressing specificially the problem of underaged individuals obtainingalcoholic beverages. The State must show progress in addressing this problemin subsequent years. The agency does not propose to specify the particularitems of information that States must submit in support of these aspectsof its system. However, some examples of information the agency might considerinclude: the number and the average period of time that driver or liquorlicenses are actually suspended in the State for the purchase, sale orpublic possession of alcoholic beverages by persons under the age of 21;The amounts of fines or penalties assessed and collected and other penaltiesimposed and served for this type of violation; the amount of time and resourcesdedicated to the enforcement of this program; the number of alcohol-relatedfatal and non-fatal crashes which involved an underaged driver; the numberof underaged drivers charged and found to be operating a motor vehiclewhile under the influence of alcohol; examples of training and promotionalmaterials or electronic and print advertising developed and used and anestimate of the exposure obtained in the State (through dollar value and/orthe number of people reached from each target audience).The agency requests comments, particularly from the States, regarding whetherwe should provide further guidance on, or specifically identify in theregulation, the particular items of information that States must submitto demonstrate compliance with this requirement. The agency proposes to award the full 10 percent to States that have aqualifying program for prevention of operators under 21 from obtainingalcoholic beverages.3. <T3>Program Making Unlawful Open Containers and Consumption of Alcoholin Motor Vehicles.</T3> Section 410(f)(3) of the Act specifies that eligibleStates must:<ITAG tagnum="20">make unlawful the possession of any open alcoholic beverage container,or the consumption of any alcoholic beverage, in the passenger area ofany motor vehicle located on a public highway or the right-of-way of apublic highway, except_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) as allowed in the passenger area, by persons (other than the driver),of any motor vehicle designed to transport more than 10 passengers (includingthe driver) while being used to provide charter transportation of passengers;or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) as otherwise specifically allowed by such State, with the approvalof the Secretary, but in no event may the driver of such motor vehiclebe allowed to possess or consumer an alcoholic beverage in the passengerarea.</ITAG>The terms ``alcoholic beverage,'' ``motor vehicle'' and ``open alcoholicbeverage container,'' which are used to describe the criteria for thisgrant, are defined by statute. The statutory definitions are reflectedin andSection; 1313.3 of the proposed regulation. The Act provides that a State which meets the criteria for this grant mayreceive up to 25 percent of its FY 1989 section 402 apportionment. As statedearlier in this notice, the agency proposes to award a grant of 10 percentof this apportionment, rather than the full 25 percent, to States undercertain circumstances. States would be able to qualify for the full 25percent, however, by submitting additional information not required toqualify for the 10 percent grant.To demonstrate compliance for the 10 percent grant, in the first and insubsequent years, the State would be required to submit only a law, regulationor binding policy directive which provides for each element of the unlawfulopen container and consumption of alcohol requirement. States must prohibitboth the possession of an open container and the consumption of alcoholicbeverages in a motor vehicle to qualify. The State would not be requiredto submit any data, but would have to identify any exceptions to its opencontainer and consumption law, and provide sufficient justification forthe agency to approve any exception not specifically permitted by the Federalstatute. The statute permits an exception for persons (other than the driver)in the passenger area of a motor vehicle designed to transport more than10 persons (bus) while being used to provide charter transportation ofpassengers. To demonstrate compliance for the 25 percent grant, in the first and insubsequent years, the State would be required to submit the informationidentified above. In addition, the State would have to show that its lawprovides for meaningful penalties, and submit data demonstrating that theState maintains an effective and highly visible enforcement program. The agency is considering and requests comments on whether to specify,in the regulation, the particular penalties that must be imposed. As statedearlier, the current research suggests that license-based penalties areeffective as both a specific and a general deterrent of drinking and driving.Other penalties, however, may be equally effective. Our preliminary review of State open container and consumption laws revealsa variety of penalties, which include fines, imprisonment and, in somecases, the suspension of a driver's license. The penalties, in most States,escalate for repeat offenders, and those States which provide for a driver'slicense suspension, generally do not impose a minimum suspension term.The agency requests comments on whether these or other penalties (suchas a mandatory driver's license suspension for a minimum of thirty days)would be meaningful to individuals who unlawfully possess open containersor consume alcoholic beverages in motor vehicles. The State would have to show progress in subsequent years. The agency doesnot propose to specify the particular items of information that Statesmust submit in support of their enforcement and public information efforts,or to demonstrate progress. However, some examples of information the agencymight consider include the number and the average period of time for whichlicenses are actually suspended under the State's open container and consumptionlaws, the amount of time and resources dedicated to the enforcement ofthis program, examples of promotional materials or electronic and printadvertising developed and used and an estimate of the exposure obtainedin the State (through dollar value and/or the number of people reachedfrom the target audience). The agency requests comments, particularly from the States, regarding whetherwe should provide further guidance on, or specifically identify in theregulation, the particular items of information that States must submitto demonstrate compliance with this requirement. 4. <T3>Suspension of Registration and Return of License Plate Program.</T3>Section 410(f)(4) specifies that eligible States must provide for:<ITAG tagnum="20">the suspension of the registration of, and the return to such Stateof the license plates for, any motor vehicle owned by an individual who_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) has been convicted on more than one occasion of an alcohol-relatedtraffic offense within any 5-year period following the date of the enactmentof this section; or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) has been convicted of driving while his or her driver's licenseis suspended or revoked by reason of a conviction for * * * an [alcohol-relatedtraffic] offense. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A State may provide limited exceptions to such suspension of registrationor return of license plates, on an individual basis, to avoide undue hardshipto any individual, including any family member of the convicted individual,and any co-owner of the motor vehicle, who is completely dependent on themotor vehicle for the necessities of life. Such exceptions may not resultin unrestricted reinstatement of the registration or unrestricted returnof the license plates of the motor vehicle.</ITAG>According to Senate Report 100-594 on S. 2549, this supplemental grantwas established by Congress in recognition of its concern that many alcohol-relatedtraffic offenders continue to drive even after their driver's licenseshave been suspended. The Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportationestimates in its report, and the agency agrees, that between 50 and 60percent of those individuals who have had their licenses revoked or suspended,nonetheless continue to drive. In addition, NHTSA believes the problemmay well increase in the future as the use of driver license sanctionscontinues to grow.The statute provides for the suspension of the offender's registrationand the return of the offender's license plates to the State. The agencyis aware that some States provide for confiscation procedures, while othersprovide instead for a license plate impoundment process. Like the revocationof a driver's license, if the license plates of a motor vehicle are confiscated,the individual must apply for new license plates before that vehicle canbe returned to service. As with a driver's license suspension, this stepis not necessary if the license plates of the vehicle are impounded, althoughsome action may need to be taken, such as the payment of reinstatementfees. We believe there is less of an administrative burden to States usinga confiscation procedure. Under andSection; 1313.3(j) of the proposed regulation,the agency would leave the choice to the States and accept either methodof suspending registrations and returning license plates to the State.The Act does not specify the period of time for which offenders must losetheir motor vehicle registration and license plates. The agency proposesto require, in andSection; 1313.3(j) of the regulation, that States reinstateoffenders' registration and release their license plates only after theyhave completed their <T3>driver's license</T3> suspension or revocation term(s). For example,if the offender is found to be driving with a suspended license and has,at that time, served five months of a one-year suspension term, the individual'sregistration would have to be suspended and his or her license plates returnedto the State for the remaining seven months of the one-year term. In addition,if the individual's driver's license suspension term is extended for anadditional year for this offense under State law, the registration andlicense plates must not be released to the offender until after this additionalterm has also been completed. States would, of course, be at liberty toimpose more stringent penalties. The agency requests comments on this aspectof its proposal.The statutory criterion for this supplemental grant requires that Statesimpose the penalties identified in the Act on individuals who have been<T3>convicted</T3> on more than one occasion of alcohol-related trafficoffenses within the time period specified or <T3>convicted</T3> of driving while their driver's license is suspendedor revoked due to a <T3>conviction</T3> of an alcohol-related traffic offense. To determinewhether a State complies, therefore, the agency proposes to consider onlywhether the registration must be suspended and the license plates returnedto the State for these particular offenses. We would not consider, forexample, penalties for the following offenses: administrative loss of licenseon more than one occasion for alcohol-related traffic offenses when therewas no conviction, or conviction of driving while the offender's licenseis under suspension or revocation for a non-alcohol-related traffic offense.States would of course be free to impose these sanctions for offenses thatare not covered by section 410.To qualify, the registration of ``any motor vehicle owned'' by the offendermust be suspended and the license plates of these vehicles returned tothe State. The agency believes an offender need not be driving his or hermotor vehicle at the time of the offense for this penalty to apply to motorvehicles that he or she owns. In addition, we believe the State must imposethese penalties on <T3>all </T3>vehicles owned by the offender to meet the statutory criterion.By ``own,'' we mean that the offender's name appears on the motor vehicle'sregistration or title.Under section 410, a State may provide limited exceptions, on an individualbasis, to avoid undue hardship to any individual, such as a family memberof the convicted individual or any co-owner of the motor vehicle, who iscompletely dependent on the motor vehicle for the necessities of life.In its report on S. 2549, the Committee on Commerce, Science and Transportationstated, ``it is the intent of the Committee that the Secretary, in isuingimplementing regulations, should take a flexible approach to this criterion.The States should be permitted to strike a balance between the need toprevent the drunk driver from drivng and the needs of the family for transportation.''NHTSA had previously atempted to define ``hardship'' circumstances in thesection 408 program. When the agency first issued its implementing regulation,it specified certain conditions under which hardship, restricted or conditionaldriver's licenses could be issued to offenders when a ``hard'' suspensionwas not required. In the August 25, 1988 final rule, amending this regulationthe agency abandoned this approach as unnecessarily restrictive to theStates. To ensure that the availability of these restricted licenses didnot undermine the driver's license suspension requirements, however, weretained the condition that such licenses be issued in accordance withStatewide published guidelines developed by the State, and in exceptionalcircumstances specific to the offender. The agency proposes to includea similar generic restriction on the circumstances in which a State mayrelease license plates to individuals to avoid undue hardship. In addition,the exceptions may not result in unrestricted reinstatement of the registrationor unrestricted return of the license plates of the motor vehicle.To avoid any confusion, we also propose to state specifically, in the regulation,that while exceptions may be made to avoid undue hardship for individualswhich include a family member or a co-owner of a motor vehicle, an exceptionmay not be made to avoid undue hardship for the offender.To demonstrate compliance in the first year a State receives this grant,the State must submit a copy of its law, regulation or binding policy directivegoverning its suspension of registration and return of license plate program.The State need not submit data to obtain funding under this grant in thefirst fiscal year. The State's law, regulation or binding policy directive(which may include Statewide published guidelines), however, must establishthe conditions under which license plates may be released by the Stateand provide that releases are made in exceptional circumstances specificto the offender's motor vehicle. In addition, the agency must be able todetermine, based on the information provided, that these exceptions donot result in unrestricted reinstatement of registrations or unrestrictedreleases of license plates. As the Senate Committee on Commerce, Scienceand Transportation pointed out, in Senate Report 100-594, Minnesota's lawprovides for special and distinctive license places to be issued when ahardship exception is allowed with regard to an offender's motor vehicle.The Committee stated, and the agency agrees, that this may be one, althoughnot the only, method of avoiding undue hardship, while attempting to preventabuses by offenders. NHTSA reserves judgment on whether other aspects ofthe Minnesota law would be sufficient to qualify for this supplementalgrant program.In subsequent years, a State would be required to submit, in addition tothe information described above, data showing the number of registrationssuspended and license plates returned, that the average length of suspensionterms meets the regulatory definition, and the number, reasons for andconditions under which hardship exemptions were granted. The State wouldbe permitted to provide the necessary data based on a representative sample.The agency proposes to award the full 10 percent to States that have aqualifying suspension of registration and return of license plate program.<ITAG tagnum="84">Comments</ITAG>Interested persons are invited to comment on this proposal. All commentsmust be limited to 15 pages in length. Necessary attachments may be appendedto those submissions without regard to the 15 page limit. (49 CFR 553.21.)This limitation is intended to encourage commenters to detail their primaryarguments in a concise fashion.Written comments to the public docket must be received by July 26, 1989.The agency has not provided a longer comment period in order to meet thestatutory deadline for issuing its final rule. To expedite the submissionof comments, simultaneous with the issuance of this notice NHTSA will mailcopies to all Governors and Governors' Representatives for Highway Safety.All comments received before the close of business on the comment closingdate, will be considered and will be available for examination in the docketat the above address before and after that date. To the extent possible,comments filed after the closing date will also be considered. However,the rulemaking action may proceed at any time after that date. NHTSA willcontinue to file relevant material in the docket as it becomes availableafter the closing date, and it is recommended that interested persons continueto examine the docket for new material.Those persons desiring to be notified upon receipt of their comments inthe docket should enclose, in the envelope with their comments, a self-addressedstamped postcard. Upon receiving the comments, the docket supervisor willreturn the postcard by mail.Copies of all comments will be placed in Docket 89-02; Notice 1 of theNHTSA Docket Section in Room 5109, Nassif Building, 400 Seventh StreetSW., Washington, DC 20590.<ITAG tagnum="84">Federalism Assessment</ITAG>This rulemaking action has been analyzed in accordance with the principlesand criteria contained in Executive Order 12612, and it has been determinedthat it would have no federalism implication that warrants the preparationof a federalism asessment. The grant programs established by section 410are entirely optional for the States. While many of the eligibility requirementsare highly restrictive, they are mandated by the section 410 statute.<ITAG tagnum="84">Economic and Other Effects</ITAG>NHTSA has analyzed the effect of this action and has determined that itis not ``major'' within the meaning of Executive Order 12291, but thatit is ``significant'' within the meaning of Department of Transportationregulatory policies and procedures, because it would have a substantialimpact on State and local governments. A preliminary evaluation of theimpacts of this proposal has been prepared and placed in Docket 89-02;Notice 1. Any interested person may obtain a copy of this preliminary evaluationby writing to NHTSA's Docket Section, room 5109, 400 Seventh Street, SW.,Washington, DC 20590, or by calling the Docket Section at (202) 366-4949.In compliance with the Regulatory Flexibility Act, the agency has evaluatedthe effects of this proposed rule on small entities. Based on the evaluation,I certify that this rule would not have a significant economic impact ona substantial number of small entities. States will be recipients of anyfunds awarded under the regulation and, accordingly, the preparation ofan Initial Regulatory Flexibility Analysis is unnecessary.The requirements in this proposal that States retail and report to theFederal government information which demonstrates compliance with drunkdriving prevention incentive grant criteria, are considered to be informationcollection requirements as that term is defined by the Office of Managementand Budget (OMB) in 5 CFR Part 1320. Accordingly, these proposed requirementshave been submitted to OMB for approval, pursuant to the Paperwork ReductionAct (44 U.S.C. 3501 et seq.). Comments on the proposed information collectionrequirements should be submitted to: Office of Management and Budget, Officeof Information and Regulatory Affairs, Washington, DC 20503, Attention:Desk Officer for NHTSA. It is requested that comments sent to the OMB alsobe sent to the NHTSA rulemaking docket for this proposed action.The agency has also analyzed this proposed action for the purpose of theNational Environmental Policy Act. The agency has determined that thisaction would not have any effect on the human environment.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 23 CFR Part 1313</ITAG>Alcohol, Drugs, Grant programs, Transportation, Highway safety.In accordance with the foregoing, NHTSA proposes the addition of Part 1313of Title 23 of the Code of Federal Regulations as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 1313_INCENTIVE GRANT CRITERIA FOR DRUNK DRIVING PREVENTION PROGRAMS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1313.1 Scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1313.2 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1313.3 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1313.4 General requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1313.5 Requirements for a basic grant.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1313.6 Requirements for supplemental grants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1313.7 Award procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 23 U.S.C. 410.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1313.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope.</ITAG>This part establishes criteria, in accordance with 23 U.S.C. 410, for awardingincentive grants to States that adopt and implement comprehensive drunkdriving prevention programs which are self-sustaining and include measuresthat will improve the effectiveness of the enforcement of State drunk drivinglaws.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1313.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>The purpose of this part is to encourage States to adopt and implementcomprehensive drunk driving prevention programs which include measuresthat will discourage individuals from operating motor vehicles while underthe influence of alcohol. The criteria established are intended to ensurethat the State drunk driving prevention programs for which incentive grantsare awarded are self-sustaining, and meet or exceed minimum levels designedto improve the effectiveness of the enforcement of State drunk drivinglaws.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1313.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions</ITAG>(a) ``Alcoholic beverage'' has the meaning given such term in section 1208.3of this title, which implements section 158(c) of the National MinimumDrinking Age Act, 23 U.S.C. 158.(b) A ``comprehensive drunk driving prevention program'' means a programthat reflects the complexity and totality of the State's alcohol trafficsafety problems, incorporates multiple approaches to these problems overa sustained period of time and ensures that public and private entitieswork in concert to address these problems. The program must include, ata minimum, the following components:(1) Regularly conducted, peak-hour DWI enforcement efforts consisting ofmeasures, such as roadside sobriety checkpoints or special DWI patrols;(2) DWI prosecution, adjudication and sanctioning resources adequate tohandle increased levels of DWI arrests; (3) Other programs directed at forms of prevention other than enforcementand adjudication activities, such as school, worksite or community education;designated driver programs; transportation alternatives; responsible alcoholservice programs; server training; or treatment programs; and(4) A public information program designed to make the public aware of theproblem of drunk driving and of the above efforts in place to address it.(c) ``Fines or surcharges collected'' means all fines and penalties oradditional assessments collected, but it does not include user-type fees.(d) ``Motor vehicle'' has the meaning given such term in andSection;659.5(c)of this title, which implements 23 U.S.C. 154, the National Maximum SpeedLimit Act.(e) ``Open alcoholic beverage container'' means any bottle, can, or otherreceptacle which: (1) Contains any amount of an alcoholic beverage, (2)Is open or has a broken seal or (3) The contents of which are partiallyremoved.(f) ``Operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol''or ``under the influence of alcohol while operating the motor vehicle''means operating a vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the bloodor breath is 0.10 or more grams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of bloodor 0.10 or more grams of alcohol per 210 liters of breath, as determinedby chemical or other tests.(g) ``Repeat offender'' means any person who a law enforcement officerhas probable cause under State law to believe has committed an alcohol-relatedtraffic offense, and to whom is administered one or more chemical teststo determine whether the individual was under the influence of alcoholwhile operating the motor vehicle and who is determined, as a result ofsuch test, to be under the influence of alcohol, or who refuses to submitto such a test as proposed by the officer, more than once in any 5-yearperiod beginning after November 18, 1988.(h) ``Serious bodily injury'' means an injury, other than a fatal injury,which prevents injured persons from walking, driving or normally continuingthe activities they were capable of performing before the injury occurred.(i) With regard to an individual's driver's license, ``suspension'' or``revocation'' means:  (1) For first offenses (other than refusals), the temporary debarring ofall driving privileges for a term of not less than 90 days, or not lessthan 30 days followed immediately by a term of not less than 60 days ofa restricted, provisional or conditional license. A restricted, provisionalor conditional license may be issued only in accordance with a State law,regulation or binding policy directive establishing the conditions underwhich a restricted, provisional or conditional license may be issued orwith Statewide published guidelines and in exceptional circumstances specificto the offender. (2) For refusal to take a chemical test for first offenses, the temporarydebarring of all driving privileges for a term of not less than 90 days. (3) For second and subsequent offenses, including the refusal to take achemical test, the temporary debarring of all driving privileges for aterm of not less than one year.  (j) With regard to an individual's registration and license plates, ``suspension''and ``return'' means the temporary debarring of the privilege to operateor maintain a particular registered motor vehicle on the public highwayand the confiscation or impoundment of the motor vehicle's license platesfor not less than the term(s) for which the individual's driver's licensewill be under suspension or revocation.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1313.4  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General requirements.  </ITAG>(a) Certification requirements. To qualify for a grant under 23 U.S.C.410, a State must, for each year it seeks to qualify:  (1) Submit an application to NHTSA, 400 Seventh Street, SW., Washington,DC 20590 demonstrating that it meets the requirements of andSection;1313.5and, if applicable, andSection;1313.6  (2) Submit a certification to NHTSA, 400 Seventh Street, SW., Washington,DC 20590 that:  (i) It has a drunk driving prevention program that meets those requirements, (ii) It will use the funds awarded under 23 U.S.C. 410 only for the implementationand enforcement of drunk driving prevention programs,  (iii) It will administer the funds in accordance with 49 CFR Part 18 andOMB Circulars A-102 and A-87, and  (iv) It will maintain its aggregate expenditures from all other sourcesfor its drunk driving prevention programs at or above the average levelof such expenditures in fiscal years 1987 and 1988 (either State or Federalfiscal year 1987 and 1988 can be used); and  (3) After being informed by NHTSA that it is eligible for a grant, submit,within 120 days, to the agency a drunk driving prevention plan for up tothree years, as applicable, that describes the programs the State is andwill be implementing in order to be eligible for the grant and that providesthe necessary information, identified in andSection;1313.5 and andSection;1313.6,to demonstrate that the program comply with the applicable criteria. Theplan, must also describe how the specific supplemental criteria adoptedby a State are related to the State's overall drunk driving preventionprogram.  (b) Limitation on grants. A State may receive a grant for up to three fiscalyears subject to the following limitations:  (1) The amount received as a basic grant, under andSection;1313.5, shallnot exceed 30 percent of the State's 23 U.S.C. 402 apportionment for fiscalyear 1989.  (2) The amount received as a supplemental grant for a mandatory blood alcoholconcentration testing program, under andSection;1313.6(a), shall not exceed10 percent of the State's 23 U.S.C. 402 apportionment for fiscal year 1989. (3) The amount received as a supplemental grant for a program for preventionof operators under 21 from obtaining alcoholic beverages, under andSection;1313.6(b),shall not exceed 10 percent of the State's 23 U.S.C. 402 apportionmentfor fiscal year 1989. (4) The amount received as as supplemental grant for a program making unlawfulopen containers and consumption of alcohol in motor vehicles, under andSection;1313.6(c),shall not exceed 25 percent of the State's 23 U.S.C. 402 apportionmentfor fiscal year 1989.  (5) The amount received as a supplemental grant for a suspension of registrationand return of license plate program, under andSection;1313.6(d), shall notexceed 10 percent of the State's 23 U.S.C. 402 apportionment for fiscalyear 1989.  (6) In the first fiscal year a State receives a basic or supplemental grant,it shall be reimbursed for up to 75 percent of the cost of its drunk drivingprevention adopted pursuant to 23 U.S.C. 401;  (7) In the second fiscal year a State receives a basic or supplementalgrant, it shall be reimbursed for up to 50 percent of the cost of its drunkdriving prevention program adopted pursuant to 23 U.S.C. 410; and  (8) In the third fiscal year a State receives a basic or supplemental grant,it shall be reimbursed for up to 25 percent of the cost of its drunk drivingprevention program adopted pursuant to 23 U.S.C. 410;  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1313.5  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for a basic grant.  </ITAG>(a) To qualify for a basic incentive grant of 30 percent of its 23 U.S.C402 apportionment for fiscal year 1989, a State must have in place andimplement or adopt and implement the following requirements: (1)(i) An expedited driver's license suspension or revocation system forindividuals who operate motor vehicles while under the influence of alcoholwhich requires that:  (A) When a law enforcement officer has probable cause under State law tobelieve an individual has committed an alcohol-related traffic offenseand such individual is determined, on the basis of a chemical test, tohave been under the influence of alcohol while operating the motor vehicleor refuses to submit to such a test as proposed by the officer, the officerserve such individual with a written notice of suspension or revocationof the drivers license of such individual and take possession of such driver'slicense;  (B) The notice of suspension or revocation referred to in paragraph (a)(1)(i)(A)of this section provide information on the adminstrative procedures underwhich the State may suspend or revoke in accordance with the objectivesof this section a driver's license of an indvidual for operating a motorvehicle while under the influence of alcohol or refusing to submit to achemical test and specify any rights of the individual under such procedures; (C) The State provide, in the administrative procedures referred to inparagraph (a)(1)(i)(B) of this section, for due process of law, includingthe right to an administrative review of a driver's license suspensionor revocation;  (D) After serving notice and taking possesion of a driver's license inaccordance with paragraph (a)(1)(i)(A) of this section, the law enforcementofficer immediately report to the State entity responsible for administeringdriver's licenses all information relevant to the action taken in accordancewith this paragraph;  (E) In the case of an individual who, after November 18, 1988, is determinedon the basis of a chemical test to have been operating a motor vehicleunder the influence of alcohol or is determined to have refused to submitto such a test as proposed by the law enforcement officer, the State entityresponsible for administering driver's licenses, upon receipt of the reportof the law enforcement officer, provides for: (<T3>1</T3>) The suspension of the driver's license of such individual fora period of not less than 90 days if the individual is a first offender;and  (<T3>2</T3>) The suspension or revocation of the driver's license of suchindividual for a period of not less than 1 year if the individual is arepeat offender; and (F) The administrative review referred to under paragraph (a)(1)(i)(C)of this section shall take place and the suspension and revocation referredto under paragraph (a)(1)(i)(E) of this section take effect not later than15 days after the individual first received notice of the suspension orrevocation.(ii)(A) To demonstrate compliance in the first fiscal year the State receivesa basic grant, a Law State shall submit a copy of the law, regulation orbinding policy directive implementing or interpreting the law or regulation,which provides for each element of the 15-day expedited suspension systemrequirement.(B) To demonstrate compliance in subsequent fiscal years the State receivesa basic grant, a Law State shall submit, in addition to the informationidentified in paragraph (a)(1)(ii)(A) of this section, data showing thenumber of licenses suspended, that the average length of the suspensionterms for first offenders, first refusers, repeat offenders and repeatrefusers meets the terms defined in andSection;1313.3(i) and that the averagenumber of days it took to provide the administrative reviews and suspendthe licenses meets the promptness requirement in paragraph (a)(1)(i)(F)of this section. The State can provide the necessary data based on a representativesample. Data on the average length of the suspension term must not includelicense suspension periods which exceed the terms actually prescribed bythe State, and must reflect terms only to the extent that they are actuallycompleted. If the State's data do not meet the average license suspensionterms defined in andSection;1313.3(i), the State can demonstrate compliancewith this element by submitting a plan showing how it intends to achievethese averages.(C) For the purpose of this paragraph, ``Law State'' means a State thathas a law, regulation or binding policy directive implementing or interpretingan existing law or regulation which provides for each element of the 15-dayexpedited suspension system criterion.(iii)(A) To demonstrate compliance in the first and in subsequent yearsthe State receives a basic grant, a Data State shall submit a copy of thelaw, regulation or binding policy directive implementing or interpretingthe law or regulation, which provides for each element of the 15-day expeditedsuspension system requirement and data showing the number of licenses suspended,that the average length of the suspension terms for first offenders, firstrefusers, repeat offenders and repeat refusers meets the terms definedin andSection;1313.3(i) and that the average number of days it took to providethe administrative reviews and suspend the licenses meets the promptnessrequirement in paragraph (a)(1)(i)(F) of this section. The State can providethe necessary data based on a representative sample. Data on the averagelength of the suspension term must not include license suspension periodswhich exceed the terms actually prescribed by the State, and must reflectterms only to the extent that they are actually completed.(B) For the purpose of this paragraph, ``Data State'' means a State thathas a law, regulation or binding policy directive implementing or interpretingan existing law or regulation which provides for each element of the 15-dayexpedited suspension system criterion, except that it need not specificallyprovide for each element of paragraphs (a)(1)(i) (E) and (F) of this section.(2)(i) A self-sustaining drunk driving prevention program under which thefines or surcharges collected from individuals convicted of operating amotor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol are returned, or anequivalent amount of non-Federal funds are provided through the State'sordinary appropriations process, to those communities which have comprehensiveprograms for the prevention of such operations of motor vehicles.(ii) To demonstrate compliance in the first and in subsequent years theState receives a basic grant, a State shall submit a copy of the law, regulationor binding policy directive implementing or interpreting the law or regulation,which provides for a self-sustaining drunk driving prevention program,and for fines or surcharges to be imposed on individuals convicted of operatinga motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol. The State shall describeits criteria and procedures for reviewing community programs to determinewhether they are comprehensive, as defined in andSection;1313.3(b), and describeits procedures for returning or providing revenues to communities thathave comprehensive drunk driving prevention programs. The State shall submitdata showing the aggregate amount of fines or surcharges actually collectedand the aggregate amount of revenues actually returned or provided to communitydrunk driving prevention programs under the State's self-sustaining system.The State shall certify that these revenues are being used to continuethe operation of comprehensive drunk driving prevention programs and thata significant portion of the costs of these programs are supported withnon-Federal funds. If the State is demonstrating compliance based on theequivalent amount of non-Federal funds it provides to communities, it mustalso identify the source of these funds.(iii) For the purpose of this section, activities conducted by the Statefor the benefit of a community may be considered to have been returnedor provided to that community, provided that the community benefitted hashad an active voice in the initiation, development, and implementationof the activities for which such funds are expended. In no case may theState arbitrarily ascribe State agency expenditures as ``benefitting localcommunities.'' Where communities have had an active voice in the initiation,development, and implementation of a particular activity, and a communitywhich has not had such active voice agrees in advance of implementationto accept the benefits of the activity, the non-Federal share of the costof these benefits may be considered to have been returned or provided tothe community. Where no communities have had an active voice in the initiation,development, and implementation of a particular activity, but a politicalsubdivision requests the benefits of the activity, the non-Federal shareof the cost of these benefits may be considered to have been returned orprovided to the community. Evidence of consent and acceptance of the work,goods or services on behalf of the community must be established and maintainedon file by the State, until all basic grant funds for that fiscal yearhave been expended and audits completed.(b) To qualify for a basic incentive grant of 20 percent of its 23 U.S.C.402 apportionment of fiscal year 1989, a State must meet the requirementsof paragraphs (a)(1)(i) (A)-(E) and (a)(2)(i) of this section and requirethat the administrative review referred to under paragraph (a)(1)(i)(C)of this section shall take place and the suspension and revocation referredto under paragraph (a)(1)(i)(E) of this section take effect not later than30 days after the individual first received notice of the administrativereview and suspension or revocation, but only if the agency determinesthat the requirements of paragraph (a)(1)(i)(F) of this section would imposea hardship upon the State.(1)(i) To demonstrate compliance in the first fiscal year the State receivesa basic grant, a Law State shall submit, in addition to the informationidentified in paragraph (a)(2)(ii) of this section, a copy of the law,regulation or binding policy directive implementing or interpreting thelaw or regulator, which provides for each element of the 30-day expeditedsuspension system requirement. The State shall also explain the hardshipthat would be imposed by a 15-day administrative review and suspensionrequirement and submit a plan demonstrating how it intends to meet the15-day period identified in paragraph (a)(1)(i)(F) of this section.(ii) To demonstrate compliance in subsequent fiscal years the State receivesa basic grant, a Law State shall submit, in addition to the informationidentified in paragraph (b)(1)(i) of this section, data showing the numberof licenses suspended, that the average length of the suspension termsfor first offenders, first refusers, repeat offenders and repeat refusersmeets the terms defined in andSection;1313.3(i) and that the average numberof days it took to provide the administrative reviews and suspend the licensesmeets the promptness requirement in paragraph (b) of this section. TheState can provide the necessary data based on a representative sample.Data on the average length of the suspension term must not include licensesuspension periods which exceed the terms actually prescribed by the State,and must reflect terms only to the extent that they are actually completed.If the State's data do not meet the average license suspension terms definedin andSection;1313.3(i), the State can demonstrate compliance with this elementby submitting a plan showing how it intends to achieve these averages.Data submitted to demonstrate compliance with the promptness requirementin paragraph (b) of this section shall be part of the required showingof substantial progress toward implementing the plan identified in paragraph(b)(1)(i) of this section. The State shall also explain the hardship thatwould be imposed by a 15-day administrative review and suspension requirement.(iii) For the purpose of this paragraph, ``Law State'' means a State thathas a law, regulation or binding policy directive implementing or interpretingan existing law or regulation which provides for each element of the 30-dayexpedited suspension system criterion.(2)(i) To demonstrate compliance in the first fiscal year the State receivesa basic grant, a Data State shall submit, in addition to the informationidentified in paragraph (a)(2)(ii) of this section, a copy of the law,regulation or binding policy directive implementing or interpreting thelaw or regulation, which provides for each element of the 30-day expeditedsuspension system requirement and data showing the number of licenses suspended,that the average length of the suspension terms for first offenders, firstrefusers, repeat offenders and repeat refusers meets the terms definedin andSection;1313.3(i) and that the average number of days it took to providethe administrative reviews and suspend the licenses meets the promptnessrequirement in paragraph (b) of this section. The State can provide thenecessary data based on a representative sample. Data on the average lengthof the suspension term must not include license suspension periods whichexceed the terms actually prescribed by the State, and must reflect termsonly to the extent that they are actually completed. The State shall alsoexplain the hardship that would be imposed by a 15-day administrative reviewand suspension requirement and submit a plan demonstrating how it intendsto meet the 15-day period identified in paragraph (a)(1)(i)(F) of thissection.(ii) To demonstrate compliance in subsequent fiscal years the State receivesa basic grant, a Data State shall submit all of the information identifiedin paragraph (b)(2)(i) of this section. In addition, the data submittedto demonstrate compliance with the promptness requirement in paragraph(b) of this section shall be part of the required showing of substantialprogress toward implementing the plan identified in paragraph (b)(2)(i)of this section.(iii) For the purpose of this paragraph, ``Data State'' means a State thathas a law, regulation or binding policy directive implementing or interpretingan existing law or regulation which provides for each element of the 30-dayexpedited suspension system criterion, except that it need not specificallyprovide for each element of paragraph (a)(1)(i)(E) of this section or thepromptness requirement in paragraph (b) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1313.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for supplemental grants.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Mandatory blood alcohol concentration testing program. </T3>To qualifyfor a supplemental grant of 10 percent of its 23 U.S.C. 402 apportionmentfor fiscal year 1989, a State must have in place and implement or adoptand implement a drunk driving prevention program which meets the requirementsof andSection; 1313.5, and(1) Provide for mandatory blood alcohol concentration testing whenevera law enforcement officer has probable cause under State law to believethat a driver of a motor vehicle involved in a crash resulting in the lossof human life or serious bodily injury has committed an alcohol-relatedtraffic offense.(2)(i) To demonstrate compliance in the first fiscal year the State receivesa supplemental grant under this paragraph, a Law State shall submit a copyof the law, regulation or binding policy directive implementing or interpretingthe law or regulation, which provides for each element of the mandatorytesting requirement.(ii) To demonstrate compliance in subsequent fiscal years the State receivesa supplemental grant under this paragraph, a Law State shall submit, inaddition to the information in paragraph (a)(2)(i) of this section, datashowing the number of drivers involved in these crashes and that, whenthere was probable cause to believe the driver had comitted an alcohol-relatedtraffic offense, substantially all of these drivers were tested for alcoholcontent and the results were reported to the State. The State can providethe necessary data based on a representative sample.(iii) For the purpose of this paragraph, ``Law State'' means a State thathas a law, regulation or binding policy directive implementing or interpretingan existing law or regulation which provides for each element of the mandatorytesting criterion, including the requirement that testing is mandatory.(3)(i) To demonstrate compliance in the first and in subsequent fiscalyears the State receives a supplemental grant under this paragraph, a DataState shall submit a copy of the law, regulation or binding policy directiveimplementing or interpreting the law or regulation, which provides forthe blood alcohol concentration testing requirement. The State shall alsosubmit data showing the number of drivers involved in these crashes andthat, when there was probable cause to believe the driver had committedan alcohol-related traffic offense, substantially all of these driverswere tested for alcohol content and the results were reported to the State.The State can provide the necessary data based on a representative sample.(ii) For the purpose of this paragraph, ``Data State'' means a State thathas a law, regulation or binding policy directive implementing or interpretingan existing law or regulation which provides for each element of the mandatorytesting criterion, except that testing may be permitted rather than requiredby law.(b) <T3>Program for prevention of operators under 21 from obtaining alcoholicbeverages. </T3>To qualify for a supplemental grant of 10 percent of its23 U.S.C. 402 apportionment for fiscal year 1989, a State must have inplace and implement or adopt and implement a drunk driving prevention programwhich meets the requirements of andSection; 1313.5, and(1) Provide for an effective system for preventing operators of motor vehiclesunder age 21 from obtaining alcoholic beverages, which includes the issuanceof drivers' licenses to individuals under age 21 that are easily distinguishablein appearance from drivers' licenses issued to individuals 21 years ofage and older. The State must also make it unlawful both for a person whois less than 21 years of age to purchase and publicly possess any alcoholicbeverage and for a person to provide (by sale or otherwise) any alcoholicbeverage to a person who is less than 21 years of age; provide for meaningfulpenalties for both the underaged person and the provider of the alcoholicbeverage; and maintain an effective and highly visible enforcement program.In addition, the State must have or plans to put in place a Statewide trainingprogram for servers, vendors and its law enforcement community, and a publicinformation program for the general population addressing specificallythe problem of underaged individuals obtaining alcoholic beverages.(2) To demonstrate compliance in the first and in subsequent fiscal yearsthe State receives a supplemental grant under this paragraph, a State shallsubmit a law, regulation, or binding policy directive implementing or interpretingan existing law which makes it unlawful both for a person who is less than21 years of age to purchase and publicly possess any alcoholic beverageand for a person to provide (by sale or otherwise) any alcoholic beverageto a person who is less than 21 years of age, and which provides for meaningfulpenalties for both underaged individuals and providers of alcoholic beverages.The State must also submit sample driver's licenses issued to persons bothunder and over 21 years of age. In addition, the State shall submit datademonstrating that the enforcement program is effective and highly visible,and that the State has or plans to put in place a Statewide training programfor servers, vendors and its law enforcement community, and a public informationprogram for the general population addressing specifically the problemof underaged individuals obtaining alcoholic beverages. Specific progresstoward preventing operators of motor vehicles under 21 from obtaining alcoholicbeverages must be shown in subsequent years.(c) <T3>Program making unlawful open containers and consumption of alcoholin motor vehicles. </T3>(1) To qualify for a supplemental grant of 10 percentof its 23 U.S.C. 402 apportionment for fiscal year 1989, a State must havein place and implement or adopt and implement a drunk driving preventionprogram which meets the requirements of andSection; 1313.5, and(i) Make unlawful the possession of any open alcoholic beverage container,or the consumption of any alcoholic beverage, in the passenger area ofany motor vehicle located on a public highway or the right-of-way of publichighway except:(A) As allowed in the passenger area, by persons (other than the driver),of any motor vehicle designed to transport more than 10 passengers (includingthe driver) while being used to provide charter transportation of passengers;or (B) As otherwise specifically allowed by such State, with the approvalof NHTSA, but in no event may the driver of such motor vehicle be allowedto possess or consume and alcoholic beverage in the passenger area.(ii) To demonstrate compliance in the first and in subsequent fiscal yearsthe State receive a supplemental grant under this paragraph, a State shallsubmit a law, regulation, binding policy directive implementing or interpretingan existing law or regulation, which provides for each element of the unlawfulopen container and consumption of alcohol requirement. The State shallalso identify and provide sufficient justification for the agency to approveany exception, other than the exception that is specifically permittedunder paragraph (c)(1)(i)(A) of this section.(2)(i) To qualify for a supplemental grant of 25 percent of its 23 U.S.C.402 apportionment for fiscal year 1989, a State must meet the requirementsof paragraph (c)(1)(i) of this section, and have an effective and highlyvisible enforcement program which provides for meaningful penalties forviolations.(ii) To demonstrate compliance in the first and in subsequent fiscal yearsthe State receives a supplemental grant under this paragraph, in additionto submitting the information identified in paragraph (c)(1)(ii) of thissection, a State shall show that its law provides for meaningful penaltiesand submit data demonstrating that the State enforcement program is effectiveand highly visible. Specific progress toward deterring the unlawful possessionof open containers and the consumption of alcoholic beverages in motorvehicles must be shown in subsequent years.(d) <T3>Suspension of registration and return of license plate program. </T3>Toqualify for a supplemental grant of 10 percent of its 23 U.S.C. 402 apportionmentfor fiscal year 1989, a State must have in place and implement or adoptand implement a drunk driving prevention program which meets the requirementsof andSection; 1313.5, and (1) Provide for the suspension of the registration of, and the return tosuch State of the license plates for, any motor vehicle owned by an individualwho:(i) Has been convicted on more than one occasion of an alcohol-relatedtraffic offense within any 5-year period following November 18, 1988; or(ii) Has been convicted of driving while his or her driver's license issuspended or revoked by reason of a conviction for an alcohol-related trafficoffense; except that (iii) A State may provide limited exceptions to such suspension of registrationor return of license plates, on an individual basis, to avoid undue hardshipto any individual, including any family member of the convicted individual,and any co-owner of the motor vehicle, but not including the offender,who is completely dependent on the motor vehicle for the necessities oflife. Such exceptions may be issued only in accordance with a State law,regulation or binding policy directive establishing the conditions underwhich license plates may be released by the State or under Statewide publishedguidelines and in exceptional circumstances specific to the offender'smotor vehicle, and may not result in unrestricted reinstatement of theregistration or unrestricted return of the license plates of the motorvehicle.(2)(i) To demonstrate compliance in the first year the State receives asupplemental grant under this paragraph, the State shall submit a copyof the law, regulation or binding policy directive implementing or interpretingthe law or regulation, which provides for each element of the registrationsuspension and license plate return requirement.(ii) To demonstrate compliance in subsequent years the State receives asupplemental grant under this paragraph, the State shall submit, in additionto the information identified in paragraph (d)(2)(i) of this section, datashowing the number of registrations suspended and license plates returnedunder the State law, that the average length of the term for which theregistration was suspended and the license plates returned meets the definitionin andSection; 1313.3(j), and the number, reasons for and conditions underwhich hardship exemptions are being granted. The State must show that itis actively enforcing its law and that the hardship exceptions do not resultin unrestricted reinstatement of the registration or unrestricted returnof the license plates of the motor vehicle. The State can provide the necessarydata based on a representative sample. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1313.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Award procedures. </ITAG>For each Federal fiscal year, grants under 23 U.S.C. 410 shall be madeto eligible States upon submission of the drunk driving prevention planand certification required by andSection; 1313.4. Such grants shall be madeuntil all eligible States have received a grant or until there are insufficientfunds to award a grant to a State. Time of submission shall be determinedby the postmark for certifications delivered through the mail and by stampedreceipt for certifications delivered in person.<ITAG tagnum="21">Issued on: June 19, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Jeffrey R. Miller, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Administrator, National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-14874 Filed 6-20-89; 3:30 pm] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-59-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>